Rhode Island, session 2025, SB340.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-18-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-18 entitled "Sales and
Use Taxes — Liability and Computation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-18-18. Sales tax imposed.
A tax is imposed upon sales at retail in this state, including the purchase of animals from a
breeder, charges for rentals of living quarters in hotels as defined in § 42-63.1-2, rooming houses,
or tourist camps, at the rate of six percent (6%) of the gross receipts of the retailer from the sales
or rental charges; provided, that the tax imposed on charges for the rentals applies only to the first
period of not exceeding thirty (30) consecutive calendar days of each rental; provided, further, that
for the period commencing July 1, 1990, the tax rate is seven percent (7%). The tax is paid to the
tax administrator by the retailer at the time and in the manner provided. Excluded from this tax are
those living quarters in hotels, rooming houses, or tourist camps for which the occupant has a
written lease for the living quarters which lease covers a rental period of twelve (12) months or
more.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001180
========